Illinois, session 104th, HB2857.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Highway Work Zone Safety Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Construction or maintenance speed zone" has the same 8meaning given to that term under Section 11-605.1 of the 9Illinois Vehicle Code.10    "Motor vehicle rental company" has the meaning given to 11that term under Section 6-305.3 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.12    "Owner" means a person in whose name a motor vehicle is 13registered under the laws of this State, another state, or a 14foreign country or under the International Registration Plan.15    "Program" means the Highway Work Zone Safety Speed Control 16Program created under this Act.17    "Work zone speed limit" means a temporary speed limit 18established for a work zone by (i) the Department of 19Transportation, (ii) the Illinois State Toll Highway 20Authority, or (iii) a unit of local government that has 21jurisdiction over the highway.22    "Work zone speed safety camera system" means a 23photographic device, radar device, laser device, or other   HB2857 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1electrical or mechanical device or devices designed to record 2the speed of a vehicle and obtain a clear photograph or other 3recorded image of the vehicle, the vehicle operator, and the 4vehicle's registration plate or digital registration plate 5while the driver is violating Section 11-605.1 of the Illinois 6Vehicle Code. The photograph or other recorded image must also 7display the time, date, and location of the violation. A law 8enforcement officer is not required to be present or to 9witness the violation. 10    Section 10. Highway Work Zone Safety Speed Control 11Program. 12    (a) The Department of Transportation, in coordination with 13the Illinois State Police, shall establish the Highway Work 14Zone Safety Speed Control Program for the purposes of 15enforcing the speed limits established for construction or 16maintenance speed zones.17    (b) The Department of Transportation shall administer the 18Program in coordination with the Illinois State Police and the 19Illinois State Toll Highway Authority.20    (c) The Illinois State Police and the Department of 21Transportation shall enter into an agreement to share 22information regarding the Program.23    (d) The Department of Transportation may enter into an 24agreement with a third-party vendor to assist in the 25administration of the Program.   HB2857 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1    Section 15. Procedures.2    (a) The Illinois State Police, in conjunction with the 3Department of Transportation and the Illinois State Toll 4Highway Authority, shall set up and operate work zone speed 5safety camera systems in highway construction and maintenance 6speed zones to detect violations of posted work zone speed 7limits.8    (b) Before setting up a work zone speed safety camera 9system for the purposes of the Program:10        (1) the Illinois State Police and the Department of 11    Transportation may conduct a public information campaign 12    to inform drivers about the use of work zone speed safety 13    camera systems to detect speeds in excess of a work zone 14    speed limit; and15        (2) signs indicating that work zone speeds are 16    enforced by work zone speed safety camera systems shall be 17    clearly posted in the areas where the systems may be in 18    use. 19    Section 20. Work zone speed safety camera system operator 20requirements; duties; restrictions. The Department of 21Transportation or the Illinois State Police may employ work 22zone speed safety camera system operators to operate work zone 23speed safety camera systems in construction or maintenance 24speed zones. The Department of Transportation may adopt any   HB2857 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1rules necessary to establish requirements, duties, or 2restrictions concerning work zone speed safety camera system 3operators. 4    Section 25. Photographs and recorded images; permitted and 5nonpermitted uses. 6    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, information 7and photographs or recorded images collected under the Program 8are not discoverable by court order as evidence in a 9proceeding except to assess a penalty under Section 30.10    (b) Photographs or recorded images collected under the 11Program must be destroyed not later than 2 years after the date 12the photograph or recorded image is collected.13    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 14information and photographs or recorded images collected under 15the Program are the exclusive property of the State and not the 16property of the manufacturer or vendor of the work zone speed 17safety camera system.18    (d) Except as otherwise provided under the Illinois 19Vehicle Code or this Act, use of a photograph or recorded image 20obtained through the use of a work zone speed safety camera 21system for the purpose of enforcing a traffic offense is 22prohibited.23    (e) A photograph or recorded image obtained through the 24use of a work zone speed safety camera system may not be used 25as evidence in any action other than an action to collect a   HB2857 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1work zone speed limit fine for which the photograph or 2recorded image was obtained.3    (f) A photograph or recorded image obtained through the 4use of a work zone speed safety camera system may be used 5internally to administer the Program. However, unless 6authorized by court order, a photograph or recorded image 7obtained through the use of a work zone speed safety camera 8system may not be disclosed to anyone other than:9        (1) the owner of the motor vehicle at the time the 10    recorded speed of the motor vehicle exceeded a work zone 11    speed limit;12        (2) an individual alleged to have been operating the 13    motor vehicle at the time the work zone speed limit was 14    exceeded;15        (3) an attorney representing an individual;16        (4) a law enforcement officer;17        (5) the Illinois State Police, the Illinois State Toll 18    Highway Authority, or the Department of Transportation; or19        (6) a court.20    (g) The information and recorded images collected under 21the Program are confidential and exempt from disclosure under 22the Freedom of Information Act. 23    Section 30. Civil law violation. 24    (a) A person who owns a motor vehicle that is identified by 25an automated traffic control system as operating in a   HB2857 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1construction or maintenance speed zone at a speed in excess of 2the posted speed limit commits a civil law violation.3    (b) A person found to have committed a violation in 4subsection (a) or subsection (c):5        (1) Is guilty of a civil law violation punishable by a 6    minimum fine of $100 and a maximum fine of $200. The 7    proceeds of the fine shall be payable to the clerk of the 8    circuit court. Within one month after the deposit of the 9    fine, the clerk shall distribute the proceeds of the fine 10    as follows: 11            (A) $10 of the fine to the circuit clerk;12            (B) $10 of the fine to the State's Attorney;13            (C) $50 of the fine to the Transportation Safety 14        Highway Hire-back Fund in the State treasury; and15            (D) any remainder of the fine to the State Police 16        Vehicle Fund in the State treasury.17        (2) With respect to funds designated for the Illinois 18    State Police, the moneys shall be remitted by the circuit 19    court clerk to the Illinois State Police within one month 20    after receipt for deposit into the State Police Vehicle 21    Fund. 22        (3) With respect to moneys designated for the 23    Department of Transportation, the moneys shall be remitted 24    by the circuit court clerk to the Department of 25    Transportation within one month after receipt for deposit 26    into the Transportation Safety Highway Hire-back Fund.  HB2857 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1    (c) A person found to have committed a third or subsequent 2violation of subsection (a), and found to have failed to pay 3all fines and costs within 30 days of the last judgment, 4commits a separate civil law violation. The State may proceed 5with collections in accordance with the law against a person 6who is guilty under this Act but has failed to pay all fines 7and costs. 8    Section 35. Vehicle rental or leasing company's 9identification of a renter or lessee. 10    (a) A civil law violation issued under this Act to a motor 11vehicle rental or leasing company shall be dismissed with 12respect to the rental or leasing company if: 13        (1) the company responds to the civil law violation by 14    submitting, within 30 days of the mailing of the citation, 15    an affidavit of non-liability stating that, at the time of 16    the alleged speeding or other traffic violation, the 17    vehicle was in the custody and control of a renter or 18    lessee under the terms of a rental agreement or lease; and 19        (2) the company provides the driver's license number, 20    name, and address of the renter or lessee. 21    (b) A civil law violation dismissed with respect to a 22motor vehicle rental or leasing company in accordance with 23subsection (a) may then be issued and delivered by mail or 24other means to the renter or lessee identified in the 25affidavit of non-liability.   HB2857 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1    Section 40. Procurement. The Department of Transportation 2may procure such as is necessary to implement and administer 3this Act. 4    Section 45. Rulemaking. The Department of Transportation 5shall adopt rules to implement and administer this Act. 6    Section 900. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 7changing Section 7.5 as follows: 8    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)9    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 10by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 11exempt from inspection and copying:12        (a) All information determined to be confidential 13    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 14    Development Act.15        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 16    library users with specific materials under the Library 17    Records Confidentiality Act.18        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 19    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 20    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 21    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 22    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it   HB2857 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1    has received.2        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 3    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 4    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 5    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 6    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 7    Infection Control Act.8        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 9    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.10        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 11    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 12    Qualifications Based Selection Act.13        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 14    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 15    Tuition Act.16        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 17    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 18    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 19    general's office that would be exempt if created or 20    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 21    that Act.22        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 23    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 24    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 25    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.26        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution   HB2857 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 2    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.3        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 4    or driver identification information compiled by a law 5    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 6    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.7        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 8    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 9    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 10    Prevention Review Team Act.11        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 12    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 13    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 14    authorized under that Article.15        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 16    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 17    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 18    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 19    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 20    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 21    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.22        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 23    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 24    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.25        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 26    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or   HB2857 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 2    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 3    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 4    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 5    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 6    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 7    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 8    Act (repealed). 9        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 10    Personnel Record Review Act. 11        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 12    Illinois School Student Records Act. 13        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 14    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 15        (t) (Blank). 16        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 17    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 18    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 19        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 20    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 21    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 22    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 23    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 24    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 25    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 26    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed   HB2857 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 2    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 3        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 4    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 5    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.6        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 7    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 8    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.9        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 10    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 11    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 12        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 13    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 14    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 15    information about the identity and administrative finding 16    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 17    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 18    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 19    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 20        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 21    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 22    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 23    Act. 24        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 25    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 26        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from   HB2857 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 2        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 3    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 4    authorized under that Act.5        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 6    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 7    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 8        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 9    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 10        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 11    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 12        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 13    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 14    Code. 15        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 16    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 17        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 18    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 19    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 20        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 21    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 22    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 23    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 24    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 25        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 26    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act.   HB2857 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 2    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 3    Aid Code. 4        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 5    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 6        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 7    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 8        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 9    arising out of a peer support counseling session 10    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 11    Suicide Prevention Act. 12        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 13    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 14    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 15    Prevention Act. 16        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 17    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 18    under the Reproductive Health Act. 19        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 20    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 21        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 22    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 23    Human Rights Act.24        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 25    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 26    Act.   HB2857 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 2    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 3        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 5    Public Aid Code. 6        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 7    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 8        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 9    information that shall not be made public under the 10    Illinois Insurance Code. 11        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 12    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.13        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 14    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 15        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 16    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 17        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 18    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 19    Police Act. 20        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 21    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 22    Administrative Code of Illinois. 23        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 24    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 25    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 26    Trafficking, or Stalking Act.   HB2857 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 2    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 3    Violence Fatality Review Act. 4        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 5    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 6    July 1, 2025. 7        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 8    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 9    Agency Licensing Act. 10        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 11    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 12    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 13    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 14    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 15    Act. 16        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 17    the School Safety Drill Act. 18        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 19    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 20        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 21    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 22    Act. 23        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 24    2-3.196 of the School Code. 25        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 26    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois   HB2857 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1    Power Agency Act. 2        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 3    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 4    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 5        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 6    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 7    Act. 8        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 9    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 10    Act. 11        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 12    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 13        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 14    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 15    Transmission Modernization Act. 16        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 17    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.18        (ttt) Information prohibited from being disclosed 19    under subsection (g) of Section 25 of the Highway Work 20    Zone Safety Act. 21(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 22102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 238-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 24102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 256-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 26eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23;   HB2857 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 27-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 3eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 4103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 5    Section 905. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 6changing Sections 3-400, 11-605.1, 11-612, and 12-502 as 7follows: 8    (625 ILCS 5/3-400)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-400)9    Sec. 3-400. Definitions. Notwithstanding the definitions 10set forth in Chapter 1 of this Act, for the purposes of this 11Article, the following words shall have the meaning ascribed 12to them as follows:13    "Apportionable Fee" means any periodic recurring fee 14required for licensing or registering vehicles, such as, but 15not limited to, registration fees, license or weight fees.16    "Apportionable Vehicle" means any vehicle, except 17recreational vehicles, vehicles displaying restricted plates, 18city pickup and delivery vehicles, buses used in 19transportation of chartered parties, and government owned 20vehicles that are used or intended for use in 2 or more member 21jurisdictions that allocate or proportionally register 22vehicles, in a fleet which is used for the transportation of 23persons for hire or the transportation of property and which 24has a gross vehicle weight in excess of 26,000 pounds; or has   HB2857 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1three or more axles regardless of weight; or is used in 2combination when the weight of such combination exceeds 26,000 3pounds gross vehicle weight. Vehicles, or combinations having 4a gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less and two-axle 5vehicles may be proportionally registered at the option of 6such owner.7    "Base Jurisdiction" means, for purposes of fleet 8registration, the jurisdiction where the registrant has an 9established place of business, where operational records of 10the fleet are maintained and where mileage is accrued by the 11fleet. In case a registrant operates more than one fleet, and 12maintains records for each fleet in different places, the 13"base jurisdiction" for a fleet shall be the jurisdiction 14where an established place of business is maintained, where 15records of the operation of that fleet are maintained and 16where mileage is accrued by that fleet.17    "Operational Records" means documents supporting miles 18traveled in each jurisdiction and total miles traveled, such 19as fuel reports, trip leases, and logs.20    "Owner" means a person who holds legal title of a motor 21vehicle, or in the event a motor vehicle is the subject of an 22agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof with the 23right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in 24the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested 25in the conditional vendee or lessee with right of purchase, or 26in the event a mortgagor of such motor vehicle is entitled to   HB2857 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1possession, or in the event a lessee of such motor vehicle is 2entitled to possession or control, then such conditional 3vendee or lessee with right of purchase or mortgagor or lessee 4is considered to be the owner for the purpose of this Act.5    "Registration plate or digital registration plate cover" 6means any tinted, colored, painted, marked, clear, or 7illuminated object that is designed to (i) cover any of the 8characters of a motor vehicle's registration plate or digital 9registration plate; or (ii) distort a recorded image of any of 10the characters of a motor vehicle's registration plate or 11digital registration plate recorded by an automated 12enforcement system as defined in Section 11-208.6, 11-208.8, 13or 11-1201.1 of this Code or recorded by an automated traffic 14control system as defined in Section 5 of the Highway Work Zone 15Safety Act. 15 of the Automated Traffic Control Systems in 16Highway Construction or Maintenance Zones Act. 17    "Rental Owner" means an owner principally engaged, with 18respect to one or more rental fleets, in renting to others or 19offering for rental the vehicles of such fleets, without 20drivers.21    "Restricted Plates" shall include, but is not limited to, 22dealer, manufacturer, transporter, farm, repossessor, and 23permanently mounted type plates. Vehicles displaying any of 24these type plates from a foreign jurisdiction that is a member 25of the International Registration Plan shall be granted 26reciprocity but shall be subject to the same limitations as   HB2857 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1similar plated Illinois registered vehicles.2(Source: P.A. 101-395, eff. 8-16-19.) 3    (625 ILCS 5/11-605.1)4    Sec. 11-605.1. Special limit while traveling through a 5highway construction or maintenance speed zone.6    (a) A person may not operate a motor vehicle in a 7construction or maintenance speed zone at a speed in excess of 8the posted speed limit when workers are present. 9    (a-5) A person may not operate a motor vehicle in a 10construction or maintenance speed zone at a speed in excess of 11the posted speed limit when workers are not present. 12    (b) Nothing in this Chapter prohibits the use of 13electronic speed-detecting devices within 500 feet of signs 14within a construction or maintenance speed zone indicating the 15zone, as defined in this Section, nor shall evidence obtained 16by use of those devices be inadmissible in any prosecution for 17speeding, provided the use of the device shall apply only to 18the enforcement of the speed limit in the construction or 19maintenance speed zone. 20    (c) As used in this Section, a "construction or 21maintenance speed zone" is an area in which the Department, 22Toll Highway Authority, or local agency has posted signage 23advising drivers that a construction or maintenance speed zone 24is being approached, or in which the Department, Authority, or 25local agency has posted a lower speed limit with a highway   HB2857 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1construction or maintenance speed zone special speed limit 2sign after determining that the preexisting established speed 3limit through a highway construction or maintenance project is 4greater than is reasonable or safe with respect to the 5conditions expected to exist in the construction or 6maintenance speed zone.7    If it is determined that the preexisting established speed 8limit is safe with respect to the conditions expected to exist 9in the construction or maintenance speed zone, additional 10speed limit signs which conform to the requirements of this 11subsection (c) shall be posted.12    Highway construction or maintenance speed zone special 13speed limit signs shall be of a design approved by the 14Department. The signs must give proper due warning that a 15construction or maintenance speed zone is being approached and 16must indicate the maximum speed limit in effect. The signs 17also must state that higher fines apply the amount of the 18minimum fine for a violation. 19    (d) Except as provided under subsection (d-5), a person 20who violates this Section is guilty of a petty offense. 21Violations of this Section are punishable with a minimum fine 22of $250 for the first violation and a minimum fine of $750 for 23the second or subsequent violation.24    (d-5) A person committing a violation of this Section is 25guilty of aggravated special speed limit while traveling 26through a highway construction or maintenance speed zone when   HB2857 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1he or she drives a motor vehicle at a speed that is:2        (1) 26 miles per hour or more but less than 35 miles 3    per hour in excess of the applicable special speed limit 4    established under this Section or a similar provision of a 5    local ordinance and is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; or6        (2) 35 miles per hour or more in excess of the 7    applicable special speed limit established under this 8    Section or a similar provision of a local ordinance and is 9    guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. 10    (e) (Blank). 11    (e-5) The Illinois State Police and the local county 12police department have concurrent jurisdiction over any 13violation of this Section that occurs on an interstate 14highway. 15    (f) The Transportation Safety Highway Hire-back Fund, 16which was created by Public Act 92-619, shall continue to be a 17special fund in the State treasury. Subject to appropriation 18by the General Assembly and approval by the Secretary, the 19Secretary of Transportation shall use all moneys in the 20Transportation Safety Highway Hire-back Fund to hire off-duty 21Illinois State Police officers to monitor construction or 22maintenance zones.23    (f-5) Each county shall create a Transportation Safety 24Highway Hire-back Fund. The county shall use the moneys in its 25Transportation Safety Highway Hire-back Fund to hire off-duty 26county police officers to monitor construction or maintenance   HB2857 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1zones in that county on highways other than interstate 2highways. The county, in its discretion, may also use a 3portion of the moneys in its Transportation Safety Highway 4Hire-back Fund to purchase equipment for county law 5enforcement and fund the production of materials to educate 6drivers on construction zone safe driving habits. 7    (g) For a second or subsequent violation of this Section 8within 2 years of the date of the previous violation, the 9Secretary of State shall suspend the driver's license of the 10violator for a period of 90 days. This suspension shall only be 11imposed if the current violation of this Section and at least 12one prior violation of this Section occurred during a period 13when workers were present in the construction or maintenance 14zone. 15(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 16    (625 ILCS 5/11-612)17    Sec. 11-612. Certain systems to record vehicle speeds 18prohibited. Except as authorized in the Highway Work Zone 19Safety Act Automated Traffic Control Systems in Highway 20Construction or Maintenance Zones Act and Section 11-208.8 of 21this Code, no photographic, video, or other imaging system may 22be used in this State to record vehicle speeds for the purpose 23of enforcing any law or ordinance regarding a maximum or 24minimum speed limit unless a law enforcement officer is 25present at the scene and witnesses the event. No State or local   HB2857 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1governmental entity, including a home rule county or 2municipality, may use such a system in a way that is prohibited 3by this Section. The regulation of the use of such systems is 4an exclusive power and function of the State. This Section is a 5denial and limitation of home rule powers and functions under 6subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 7Constitution.8(Source: P.A. 97-672, eff. 7-1-12.) 9    (625 ILCS 5/12-502)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 12-502)10    Sec. 12-502. Mirrors. 11    (a) Every motor vehicle, operated singly or when towing 12another vehicle, shall be equipped with a mirror so located as 13to reflect to the driver a view of the highway for a distance 14of at least 200 feet to the rear of such motor vehicle.15    (b) A public transit agency may use an electronic 16rear-view monitoring system on commercial motor vehicles owned 17by the agency as an alternative to the requirements of this 18Section and the mirror requirements of 49 CFR 393.80 so long as 19an exemption to 49 CFR 393.80 granted by the Federal Motor 20Carrier Safety Administration remains in effect. 21(Source: P.A. 82-122.) 22    (625 ILCS 7/Act rep.)23    Section 910. The Automated Traffic Control Systems in 24Highway Construction or Maintenance Zones Act is repealed.   HB2857 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 08086 LNS 18132 b1    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law, except that Section 910 takes effect January 1, 32027.